Utah statutes.
17-36-20.   Purchases or encumbrances by purchasing agent.

(1) (a)  On or before December 31, 2014, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is not subject to the provisions of this section; and

(b)  on or after January 1, 2015, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is subject to the provisions of this section.

(2)  A person may not make a purchase or incur an encumbrance on behalf of a county unless that person acts in accordance with an order by, or approval of, the person duly authorized to act as purchasing agent for the county, except encumbrances or expenditures directly investigated and specifically approved by the executive or legislative body.

(3)  Unless otherwise provided by the governing body, the budget officer or the budget officer's agents shall serve as a purchasing agent.



Amended by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

